Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-502
Terms,
defined.

For purposes of the Food Supply Animal Veterinary
Incentive Program Act:

(1) Department means the Department of
Agriculture;

(2) Food supply animal includes cattle, hogs, sheep,
goats, and poultry;

(3) Food supply animal veterinarian means
a veterinarian who is engaged in general or food supply animal practice as
his or her primary focus of practice and who has a substantial portion of
his or her practice devoted to food supply animal veterinary medicine;

(4)
Program means the Food Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive Program; and

(5)
Rural mixed animal veterinary practice means practice as a food supply animal
veterinarian in a rural area and a substantial portion of the practice involves
food supply animal veterinary practice.

Laws
2008, LB1172, § 2.